Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.08.150

Expense of registration.

The expense of registration in all rural precincts must be paid by the county. The expense of registration in all precincts lying wholly within a city or town must be paid by the city or town. Registration expenses for this section include both active and inactive voters.

[ 2003 c 111 s 214; 1965 c 9 s 29.07.030. Prior: 1939 c 82 s 1, part; 1933 c 1 s 4, part; RRS s 5114-4, part; prior: 1891 c 104 s 4; RRS s 5119. Formerly RCW 29.07.030.]